Wisconsin, session 2025, AB586.
do enact as follows:AB586,11Section 1. 36.09 (3m) of the statutes is repealed.AB586,22Section 2. 36.09 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB586,3,10336.09 (4) Faculty. The faculty of each institution, subject to the 1responsibilities and powers of the board, the president, and the chancellor of such 2institution, shall be vested with responsibility for the immediate governance of such 3institution and shall actively participate in institutional policy development. As 4such, the faculty shall have the primary responsibility for advising the chancellor 5regarding academic and educational activities and faculty personnel matters. The 6faculty of each institution shall have the right to determine their own faculty 7organizational structure and to select representatives to participate in institutional 8governance, except that the faculty of each institution shall ensure that faculty in 9academic disciplines related to science, technology, engineering, and mathematics 10are adequately represented in the faculty organizational structure.AB586,311Section 3. 36.09 (4m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB586,3,211236.09 (4m) Academic staff. The academic staff members of each institution, 13subject to the responsibilities and powers of the board, the president, the chancellor, 14and the faculty of the institution, shall be active participants in the immediate 15governance of and policy development for the institution. The academic staff 16members have the primary responsibility for advising the chancellor regarding the 17formulation and review, and shall be represented in the development, of all policies 18and procedures concerning academic staff members, including academic staff 19personnel matters. The academic staff members of each institution shall have the 20right to organize themselves in a manner they determine and to select their 21representatives to participate in institutional governance.AB586,422Section 4. 36.09 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:AB586,4,102336.09 (5) Students. The students of each institution or campus subject to the 1responsibilities and powers of the board, the president, the chancellor, and the 2faculty shall be active participants in the immediate governance of and policy 3development for such institutions. As such, students shall have primary 4responsibility for advising the chancellor regarding the formulation and review of 5policies concerning student life, services, and interests. Students in consultation 6with the chancellor and subject to the final confirmation of the board shall have the 7responsibility for the disposition of those student fees which constitute substantial 8support for campus student activities. The students of each institution or campus 9shall have the right to organize themselves in a manner they determine and to 10select their representatives to participate in institutional governance.AB586,4,1111